Illinois, session 104th, SB1675.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Code of Military Justice is 5amended by changing Sections 1 and 133 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1807/1)7    Sec. 1. Article 1. Definitions; gender neutrality.8    (a) In this Code, unless the context otherwise requires:9        (1) "Accuser" means a person who signs and swears to 10    charges, any person who directs that charges nominally be 11    signed and sworn to by another, and any other person who 12    has an interest other than an official interest in the 13    prosecution of the accused.14        (2) "Cadet" or "candidate" means a person who is 15    enrolled in or attending a State military academy, a 16    regional training institute, or any other formal education 17    program for the purpose of becoming a commissioned officer 18    in the State military forces.19        (3) "Classified information" means:20            (A) any information or material that has been 21        determined by an official of the United States or any 22        state pursuant to law, an Executive order, or 23        regulation to require protection against unauthorized   SB1675 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08633 KTG 18685 b1        disclosure for reasons of national or state security, 2        and3            (B) any restricted data, as defined in Section 4        11(y) of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 (42 U.S.C. 5        2014(y)).6        (4) "Code" means this Code.7        (5) "Commanding officer" includes only commissioned or 8    warrant officers of the State military forces and shall 9    include officers in charge only when administering 10    nonjudicial punishment under Article 15 of this Code. The 11    term "commander" has the same meaning as "commanding 12    officer" unless the context otherwise requires.13        (6) "Convening authority" includes, in addition to the 14    person who convened the court, a commissioned officer 15    commanding for the time being or a successor in command to 16    the convening authority.17        (7) "Day" for all purposes means calendar day 18    beginning at 0000 hours (12:00 a.m.) and ending at 2359 19    hours, 59 seconds (12:59, 59 seconds p.m.), and is not 20    synonymous with the term "unit training assembly". Any 21    punishment authorized by this Article which is measured in 22    terms of days shall, when served in a status other than 23    annual field training, be construed to mean succeeding 24    duty days.25        (8) "Duty status other than State active duty" means 26    any other type of military duty or training pursuant to a   SB1675 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08633 KTG 18685 b1    written order issued by authority of law under Title 32 of 2    the United States Code or traditional Inactive Duty 3    Training periods pursuant to 32 U.S.C. 502(a).4        (9) "Enlisted member" means a person in an enlisted 5    grade.6        (10) "Judge advocate" means a commissioned officer of 7    the organized State military forces who is a member in 8    good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state, 9    and is:10            (A) certified or designated as a judge advocate in 11        the Judge Advocate General's Corps of the Army, Air 12        Force, Navy, or the Marine Corps or designated as a law 13        specialist as an officer of the Coast Guard, or a 14        reserve or National Guard component of one of these; 15        or16            (B) certified as a non-federally recognized judge 17        advocate, under regulations adopted pursuant to this 18        paragraph, by the senior judge advocate of the 19        commander of the force in the State military forces of 20        which the accused is a member, as competent to perform 21        such military justice duties required by this Code. If 22        there is no such judge advocate available, then such 23        certification may be made by such senior judge 24        advocate of the commander of another force in the 25        State military forces, as the convening authority 26        directs.  SB1675 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08633 KTG 18685 b1        (11) "May" is used in a permissive sense. The phrase 2    "no person may . . ." means that no person is required, 3    authorized, or permitted to do the act prescribed.4        (12) "Military court" means a court-martial or a court 5    of inquiry.6        (13) "Military judge" means an official of a general 7    or special court-martial detailed in accordance with 8    Article 26 of this Code.9        (14) "Military offenses" means those offenses 10    proscribed under Articles 77 (Principals), 78 (Accessory 11    after the fact), 80 (Attempts), 81 (Conspiracy), 82 12    (Soliciting commission of offenses Solicitation), 83 13    (Malingering Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or 14    separation), 84 (Breach of medical quarantine Unlawful 15    enlistment, appointment, or separation), 85 (Desertion), 16    86 (Absence without leave), 87 (Missing movement; jumping 17    from vessel), 87a (Resistance, flight, breach of arrest, 18    and escape), 88 (Contempt toward officials), 89 19    (Disrespect towards superior commissioned officer; assault 20    of superior commissioned officer), 90 (Willfully 21    Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned 22    officer), 91 (Insubordinate conduct toward warrant 23    officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer), 92 24    (Failure to obey order or regulation), 93 (Cruelty and 25    maltreatment), 93a (Prohibited activities with military 26    recruit or trainee by person in position of special trust)   SB1675 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08633 KTG 18685 b1    94 (Mutiny or sedition), 95 (Offenses by sentinel or 2    lookout), 95a (Disrespect toward sentinel or lookout 3    Resistance, flight, breach of arrest, and escape), 96 4    (Release of Releasing prisoner without proper authority; 5    drinking with prisoner), 97 (Unlawful detention), 98 6    (Misconduct as prisoner Noncompliance with procedural 7    rules), 99 (Misbehavior before the enemy), 100 8    (Subordinate compelling surrender), 101 (Improper use of 9    countersign), 102 (Forcing a safeguard), 103b (Aiding the 10    enemy), 104a (Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or 11    separation), 104b (Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or 12    separation), 105a (False or unauthorized pass offenses), 13    106 (Impersonation of officer, noncommissioned or petty 14    officer, or agent or official), 106a (Wearing unauthorized 15    insignia, decoration, badge, ribbon, device, or lapel 16    button), 103 (Captured or abandoned property), 104 (Aiding 17    the enemy), 105 (Misconduct as prisoner), 107 (False 18    official statements; false swearing), 107a (Parole 19    violation), 108 (Military property: loss, damage, 20    destruction, or wrongful disposition), 108a (Captured or 21    abandoned property), 109 (Property other than military 22    property: waste, spoilage, or destruction), 110 (Improper 23    hazarding of vessel or aircraft), 112 (Drunkenness and 24    other incapacitation offenses Drunk on duty), 112a 25    (Wrongful use, possession, etc., of controlled 26    substances), 113 (Misbehavior of sentinel), 114 (Dueling),   SB1675 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08633 KTG 18685 b1    115 (Communicating threats Malingering), 116 (Riot or 2    breach of peace), 117 (Provoking speeches or gestures), 3    123 (Offenses concerning Government computers), 124 4    (Frauds against the Government), 131f (Noncompliance with 5    procedural rules), 131g (Wrongful interference with 6    adverse administrative proceeding), 132 (Retaliation 7    Frauds against the government), 133 (Conduct unbecoming an 8    officer and a gentleman), and 134 (General Article) of 9    this Code.10        (15) "National security" means the national defense 11    and foreign relations of the United States.12        (16) "Officer" means a commissioned or warrant 13    officer.14        (17) "Officer in charge" means a member of the Navy, 15    the Marine Corps, or the Coast Guard designated as such by 16    appropriate authority.17        (18) "Record", when used in connection with the 18    proceedings of a court-martial, means:19            (A) an official written transcript, written 20        summary, or other writing relating to the proceedings; 21        or22            (B) an official audiotape, videotape, digital 23        image or file, or similar material from which sound, 24        or sound and visual images, depicting the proceedings 25        may be reproduced.26        (19) "Shall" is used in an imperative sense.  SB1675 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08633 KTG 18685 b1        (20) "State" means one of the several states, the 2    District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, 3    Guam, or the U.S. Virgin Islands.4        (21) "State active duty" means active duty in the 5    State military forces under an order of the Governor or 6    the Adjutant General, or otherwise issued by authority of 7    State law, and paid by State funds.8        (22) "Senior force judge advocate" means the senior 9    judge advocate of the commander of the same force of the 10    State military forces as the accused and who is that 11    commander's chief legal advisor.12        (23) "State military forces" means the Illinois 13    National Guard, as defined in Title 32, United States Code 14    and the Military Code of Illinois and any other military 15    force organized under the Constitution and laws of this 16    State, to include the Illinois State Guard when organized 17    by the Governor as Commander-in-Chief under the Military 18    Code of Illinois and the Illinois State Guard Act, and 19    when not in a status subjecting them to exclusive 20    jurisdiction under Chapter 47 of Title 10, United States 21    Code, and travel to and from such duty.22        (24) "Superior commissioned officer" means a 23    commissioned officer superior in rank or command.24        (25) "Senior force commander" means the commander of 25    the same force of the State military forces as the 26    accused.  SB1675 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08633 KTG 18685 b1    (b) The use of the masculine gender throughout this Code 2also includes the feminine gender. 3(Source: P.A. 99-796, eff. 1-1-17.) 4    (20 ILCS 1807/133)5    Sec. 133. Article 133. Conduct unbecoming an officer and a 6gentleman. Any commissioned officer, cadet, or midshipman who 7is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman 8shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.9(Source: P.A. 101-367, eff. 8-9-19.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.